dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="diacaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbaiki__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbaikinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormat-hormati__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormat-hormatinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormati__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormatinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baiknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baik-baik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baik-baiknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sebaik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="se"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan-keberjayaan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan-keberjayaannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepemudaan-kepemudaan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepemudaan-kepemudaannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepemudaan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepemudaannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian-keabadian__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian-keabadiannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan-keseimbangan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan-keseimbangannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadiannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan-keterlambatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan-keterlambatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalaman-pedalaman__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalaman-pedalamannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalaman__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalamannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="biasa"><p><l>biasa-biasa</l><r>biasa</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lain"><p><l>lain-lain</l><r>lain</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tua"><p><l>tua-tua</l><r>tua</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lain"><p><l>lain-lainnya</l><r>lain</r></p><par n="baik-baiknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rata"><p><l>rata-ratanya</l><r>rata</r></p><par n="baik-baiknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indah"><p><l>indahnya</l><r>indah</r></p><par n="baiknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>lengkapnya</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="baiknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tepat"><p><l>tepatnya</l><r>tepat</r></p><par n="baiknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alami"><p><l>dialaminya</l><r>alami</r></p><par n="diacaknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dalam"><p><l>didalamnya</l><r>dalam</r></p><par n="diacaknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gemar"><p><l>digemari</l><r>gemar</r></p><par n="dihormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>dilengkapi</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="dihormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="selidik"><p><l>diselidiki</l><r>selidik</r></p><par n="dihormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="terang"><p><l>diterangi</l><r>terang</r></p><par n="dihormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cinta"><p><l>dicintainya</l><r>cinta</r></p><par n="dihormatinya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="suka"><p><l>disukainya</l><r>suka</r></p><par n="dihormatinya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baharu"><p><l>diperbaharui</l><r>baharu</r></p><par n="diperbaiki__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baik"><p><l>diperbaiki</l><r>baik</r></p><par n="diperbaiki__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baru"><p><l>diperbarui</l><r>baru</r></p><par n="diperbaiki__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>diperlengkapi</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="diperbaiki__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cepat"><p><l>dipercepat</l><r>cepat</r></p><par n="diperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaya"><p><l>diperkaya</l><r>kaya</r></p><par n="diperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="luas"><p><l>diperluas</l><r>luas</r></p><par n="diperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="parah"><p><l>diperparah</l><r>parah</r></p><par n="diperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malu"><p><l>dipermalukan</l><r>malu</r></p><par n="diperbanyakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>dipertahankan</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="diperbanyakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="timbang"><p><l>dipertimbangkan</l><r>timbang</r></p><par n="diperbanyakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="giat"><p><l>kegiatan-kegiatan</l><r>giat</r></p><par n="keabadian-keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kuat"><p><l>kekuatan-kekuatan</l><r>kuat</r></p><par n="keabadian-keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tentu"><p><l>ketentuan-ketentuan</l><r>tentu</r></p><par n="keabadian-keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cemerlang"><p><l>kecemerlangan</l><r>cemerlang</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kekal"><p><l>kekekalan</l><r>kekal</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rindu"><p><l>kerinduan</l><r>rindu</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>kedekatannya</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lemah"><p><l>kelemahannya</l><r>lemah</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sehat"><p><l>kesehatannya</l><r>sehat</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="imbang"><p><l>keseimbangan</l><r>imbang</r></p><par n="keseimbangan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="timbang"><p><l>kesetimbangan</l><r>timbang</r></p><par n="keseimbangan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lambat"><p><l>keterlambatan</l><r>lambat</r></p><par n="keterlambatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="labuh"><p><l>pelabuhan-pelabuhan</l><r>labuh</r></p><par n="pedalaman-pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lapuk"><p><l>pelapukan</l><r>lapuk</r></p><par n="pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lepas"><p><l>pelepasan</l><r>lepas</r></p><par n="pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="murni"><p><l>pemurnian</l><r>murni</r></p><par n="pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tualang"><p><l>petualangannya</l><r>tualang</r></p><par n="pedalamannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cepat"><p><l>secepat</l><r>cepat</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jati"><p><l>sejati</l><r>jati</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rayu"><p><l>serayu</l><r>rayu</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
